Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 19

National Park and Forest Commissions

11-19-101. Great Smoky Mountains Park commission created — Meetings.

There is hereby created the Great Smoky Mountains Park commission to devote its attention to the problems of that portion of the Great Smoky Mountains National Park which lies within this state and, to that end, shall be required to meet at least once every six (6) months to perform its functions.

Acts 1974, ch. 503, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1901; Acts 1980, ch. 494, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Great Smoky Mountain parks commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Cross-References. Authority to prohibit use of highways by commercial vehicles, § 11-18-107.

11-19-102. Members — Appointment — Term — Vacancy.

The Great Smoky Mountains Park commission shall be composed of five (5) members, one (1) member to be appointed by the governor each year, and each member to serve a five-year term.

In order that the members of the commission serve staggered terms, the initial appointments to the commission under this section shall consist of:

One (1) member to serve a term of one (1) year;

One (1) member to serve a term of two (2) years;

One (1) member to serve a term of three (3) years;

One (1) member to serve a term of four (4) years; and

One (1) member to serve a term of five (5) years.

Members shall be appointed by June 15 of each year to take office on July 1 of each year.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of a member of the commission, the governor shall appoint a new member of the commission to serve out the remainder of the vacating member's term.

The commissioner or a designee of the department of environment and conservation and the commissioner or a designee of the department of tourist development shall serve as ex officio members of the commission.

Acts 1974, ch. 503, § 2; T.C.A., § 11-1902; Acts 1980, ch. 494, § 1; 1982, ch. 799, § 3; 2004, ch. 511, § 1.

11-19-103. Functions.

It is the function of the Great Smoky Mountains Park commission to:

Have the authority to confer with the national park service, as a representative of the state of Tennessee, with regard to policies of the national park service to be observed in the Great Smoky Mountains National Park;

Furnish informational services to the United States congress with reference to the needs of the Great Smoky Mountains National Park including, but not limited to, the end of obtaining financial appropriations for the park;

Cooperate with similar commissions in other states adjacent to the Great Smoky Mountains National Park;

Urge the reasonable use of trails within the Great Smoky Mountains National Park;

Maintain, to as great an extent as possible, the entrances to the Great Smoky Mountains National Park free from commercial advertising and/or businesses; and

Take other action, as may be considered desirable, to preserve intact the natural beauty and scenery of the Great Smoky Mountains National Park. This grant of power to the commission shall be construed liberally in favor of the commission taking any action which may be considered by it advantageous to the Great Smoky Mountains National Park.

Acts 1974, ch. 503, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-1903; Acts 1980, ch. 494, § 1.

11-19-104. Annual report.

The Great Smoky Mountains Park commission shall submit an annual report of its activities to the governor and to the general assembly within fifteen (15) days after the convening of each regular legislative session, and special reports at such other times as it may deem appropriate.

Acts 1974, ch. 503, § 4; T.C.A., § 11-1904; Acts 1980, ch. 494, § 1.

11-19-105. Compensation — Expenses.

The members of the Great Smoky Mountains Park commission shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for their necessary expenses in carrying out their obligations under this chapter, including, but not limited to, reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with the official comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1974, ch. 503, § 5; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(53); T.C.A., § 11-1905; Acts 1980, ch. 494, § 1.

11-19-106. Relation to department of environment and conservation.

The Great Smoky Mountains park commission shall be administratively attached to the department of environment and conservation, but for all other purposes other than administration shall be considered independent.

This section shall be subject to the specific appropriation of funds by the general assembly.

Acts 1989, ch. 116, § 3.